Washington statutes.
RCW 11.56.030

Sale, lease or mortgage of real estate—Petition—Notice—Hearing.

Whenever it shall appear to the satisfaction of the court that any portion or all of the real property should be sold, mortgaged or leased for the purpose of raising money to pay the debts and obligations of the estate, and the expenses of administration, estate taxes, or for the support of the family, to make distribution, or for such other purposes as the court may deem right and proper, the court may order the sale, lease or mortgage of such portion of the property as appears to the court necessary for the purpose aforesaid. It shall be the duty of the personal representative to present a petition to the court giving a description of all the property of the estate and its character, the amount of the debts, expenses and obligations of the estate and such other things as will tend to assist the court in determining the necessity for the sale, lease or mortgage and the amount thereof. Unless the court shall by order expressly so provide, no notice of the hearing of such petition for sale, lease or mortgage need be given, except as provided in RCW 11.28.240 hereof; if, however, the court should order notice of such hearing, it shall determine upon the kind, character and time thereof. At the hearing of such petition the court may have brought before it such testimony or information as it may see fit to receive, for the purpose of determining whether it should order any of the property of the estate sold, leased or mortgaged. The absence of any allegation in the petition shall not deprive the court of jurisdiction to order said sale, lease or mortgage, and the court may, if it see fit, order such sale, lease or mortgage without any petition having been previously presented.

[ 1990 c 180 s 2; 1965 c 145 s 11.56.030. Prior: 1937 c 28 s 3; 1917 c 156 s 124; RRS s 1494; prior: Code 1881 s 1493; 1854 p 285 s 103.]